Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4-243] Election contests;
applicability. This part shall apply to any solicitation by any person or
group for the purpose of opposing a solicitation by any person or group with
respect to the election or removal of directors at any annual or special
meeting of stockholders. [L 2000, c 24, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next